Idaho, session 2026, H0580.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Chapter 69, Title 18, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby repealed.
SECTION 2. That Chapter 76, Title 18, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby repealed.
SECTION 3. That Chapter 77, Title 18, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby repealed.
SECTION 4. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2026.